Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-810
Historic structure; alterations; requirements.

Improvements, alterations, or changes made by the state, its agencies, or departments on or to any historic structure owned by the State of Nebraska shall be in keeping with its historical or architectural significance. Such alterations shall be made according to standards set by the United States Department of the Interior. No alteration shall be made without review and comment by the State Historic Preservation Officer. If the state, its agencies, or departments do not agree with the review and comment of the officer, a final determination as to what action must be followed by the state shall be made by the Governor. A state agency or department shall only be required to comply with this section if it has been notified in writing by the officer that a particular structure is a historic structure.

Laws 1986, LB 563, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 18, § 5.